Florida, session 2026, HB7021.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7021-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7021 2026
Section 1. Section 1008.23, Florida Statutes, is amended
to read:
1008.23 Confidentiality of assessment instruments.—
(1) All examination and assessment instruments, including
developmental materials and workpapers directly related thereto,
which are prepared, prescribed, or administered pursuant to ss.
1002.69, 1003.52, 1003.56, 1007.25, 1007.35, 1008.22, 1008.25,
and 1012.56 shall be confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1)
and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. Provisions
governing access, maintenance, and destruction of such
instruments and related materials shall be prescribed by rules
of the State Board of Education.
(1)(a)(2)(a) All examination and assessment instruments,
including developmental materials and workpapers directly
related thereto, which are held prepared, prescribed, or
administered by a public school, a district school board, a
Florida College System institution, a state university, a board
of trustees, or the Department of Education, the State Board of
Education, or the Board of Governors shall be confidential and
exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State
Constitution.
(b) The State Board of Education and the Board of
Governors shall adopt rules or regulations, respectively,
establishing retention schedules and a disposal process for
records described in paragraph (a).
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7021-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7021 2026
(c)1. Any entity listed in paragraph (a) may disclose the
information made confidential and exempt from public record
requirements by this section to any other entity listed in that
paragraph.
2. A public school, district school board, Florida College
System institution, or state university must, upon request,
disclose the information made confidential and exempt from
public record requirements by this section to the Department of
Education, the State Board of Education, or the Board of
Governors.
(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit,
abridge, or infringe on the rights of students and parents with
respect to student records and education records pursuant to ss.
1002.20 and 1002.22
(b) Provisions governing access, maintenance, and
destruction of the instruments and related materials identified
under paragraph (a) shall be prescribed by rules of the State
Board of Education and regulations of the Board of Governors,
respectively.
(2)(3) This section is subject to the Open Government
Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand
repealed on October 2, 2031 October 2, 2026, unless reviewed and
saved from repeal through reenactment by the Legislature.
Section 2. The Legislature finds that it is a public
necessity to exempt from s. 119.07(1), Florida Statutes, and s.
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7021-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7021 2026
24(a), Article I of the State Constitution, examination and
assessment instruments, including developmental materials and
workpapers directly related thereto, which are held by a public
school, a district school board, a Florida College System
institution, a state university, a board of trustees, the
Department of Education, the State Board of Education, or the
Board of Governors. Public schools and district school boards
routinely develop, license, and administer recurring classroom,
course, school, and district assessments, frequently drawing
upon secure item banks and developmental materials used across
schools and administrations. Public disclosure of test items,
prompts, answer keys, scoring rubrics, item specifications,
field-testing materials, and related developmental workpapers
would enable cheating and academic dishonesty, compromise the
validity and reliability of local assessments, undermine fair
measurement of student learning and program effectiveness, and
necessitate significant public expenditures to replace
compromised instruments and rebuild secure item banks. The
boards of trustees of Florida College System institutions and
state universities, as well the State Board of Education and the
Board of Governors, oversee institutions that develop, license,
and administer examinations and assessment instruments and in
that role receive such information, which, if made public, would
enable cheating and academic dishonesty, compromise the validity
100 and reliability of examinations and assessments, undermine fair
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7021-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7021 2026
101 measurement of student learning and program effectiveness, and
102 necessitate significant public expenditures to replace
103 compromised instruments and rebuild secure item banks. As such
104 the Legislature finds that the harm that may result from the
105 release of such examination and assessment instruments outweighs
106 any public benefit that may be derived from disclosure.
107 Section 3. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7021-00